Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-914
Zoning regulations; conflict with other laws; effect.

Whenever the regulations made pursuant to sections 19-901 to 19-905 require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a lower height of building or less number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in any other statute, local ordinance, or regulation, the provisions of the regulations made under authority of such sections shall govern. Wherever the provisions of any other statute or local ordinance or regulation require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a lower height of building or a less number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required by the regulations made under authority of such sections, the provisions of such statute, local ordinance, or regulation shall govern.

Laws 1927, c. 43, § 11, p. 188;

C.S.1929, § 19-911;

R.S.1943, § 19-914;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 81.